Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-807
Abandoned or neglected pioneer cemeteries; preservation.

The county board shall expend money from the general fund of the county for the continuous preservation and maintenance, including mowing, of an abandoned or neglected pioneer cemetery when petitioned to do so by thirty-five adult residents of the county. The county board shall publish notice of such petition in one issue of the official newspaper published and of general circulation in the county at least ten days prior to the day when the matter will be heard by the county board.

Laws 1975, LB 129, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 5.